Wyoming, session 2025, HB0327.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-26-509(k), 1-31-103, 1-35-103(a),
1-35-104, 7-3-102, 9-1-601(a) and (b), 9-1-602, 9-1-603(b)
and (c), 9-1-605(b) through (d), 9-1-608(a) and (b),
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
9-1-611(c), 9-1-618(b)(i), 9-1-633(a) and (b)(intro),
9-1-636(b) and (c)(intro), 9-4-218(a)(iii), 9-14-101,
9-14-102(c), 11-19-605(h) and (j), 18-3-902(a),
28-12-101(a)(intro) and (b), 28-12-102(b) and (c),
35-7-1004 and 35-11-1507(a) are amended to read:

1-26-509. Negotiations; scope of efforts to purchase.

(k) Attorney's fees and other expenses awarded under
this section from a public entity to a condemnee shall be
reported by the public entity which paid the fees, to the
Wyoming attorney general within sixty (60) days of the
award. The Wyoming attorney general shall collect this data
and report annually to the governor state loan and
investment board on the amount of all taxpayer funded fee
awards, beginning July 31, 2014. The report shall identify
the name of each party to whom an award was made, the name
of each counsel of record representing each party to whom
an award was made, the public agency which paid each award
and the total amount of each award.

1-31-103. Commencement of action.

HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
The attorney general or a county attorney shall commence an
action when directed by the governor a majority of the
members of the state loan and investment board, supreme
court or legislature, or when upon complaint or otherwise
he has good reason to believe that such an action can be
established by proof.

1-35-103. Violation of state contracts to be reported
to attorney general; investigation; action to recover
damages; employment of special assistants.

(a) Any officer, board or commission of the state of
Wyoming, or their legal counsel, responsible for the
enforcement of any contract between the state of Wyoming
and any person, having reason to believe that there has
been a violation of the terms of the contract to the damage
of the state of Wyoming, shall report the matter to the
attorney general of the state of Wyoming. The attorney
general shall make such investigation of the matter as is
necessary. Upon completion of the investigation and finding
of probable damages to the state of Wyoming, the attorney
general may bring suit in any court of competent
jurisdiction to recover all damages that the state of
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
Wyoming may have incurred by reason of the breach of
contract, or for any money or other property that may be
due on the contract. Subject to the governor's a majority
of the members of the state loan and investment board's
approval he may employ specially qualified assistants or
counsel to aid in any investigation of such action.

1-35-104. Actions under control of attorney general;
settlement or compromise with approval of the state loan
and investment board.

The attorney general shall control all investigations and
actions instituted and conducted in on behalf of the state
as provided in W.S. 1-35-103 and has full discretionary
powers to prosecute all investigations and litigation and,
with the approval of the governor a majority of the members
of the state loan and investment board, to settle,
compromise or dismiss the actions.

7-3-102. Appointment of attorney general to represent
state on joint commissions.

HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
The governor A majority of the members of the state loan
and investment board shall appoint the attorney general as
the commissioner who shall represent Wyoming upon any joint
commission created by Wyoming and any one (1) or more
states for the purpose of negotiating and entering into
agreements or compacts for cooperative effort and mutual
assistance in the prevention of crime and in the
enforcement of the respective criminal laws and policies of
Wyoming and any other state and for the establishment of
agencies deemed desirable for making effective any
agreement or compact.

9-1-601. Appointment; term; removal; special
assistant for legislative affairs; qualifications.

(a) The attorney general of the state of Wyoming
shall be appointed by the governor a majority of the
members of the state loan and investment board with the
advice and consent of the senate in accordance with W.S.
28-12-101 through 28-12-103 and may be removed by the
governor as provided in W.S. 9-1-202 a majority of the
members of the state loan and investment board.

HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
(b) If a majority of a newly elected governor state
loan and investment board appoints an attorney general to
take office prior to or during the legislative session next
following the governor's state loan and investment board's
election, the newly appointed attorney general designee
shall become a member of the attorney general's staff to
serve as a special assistant to the governor for
legislative affairs. When the legislative session adjourns
the attorney general's term of office shall terminate.

9-1-602. Vacancy in office.

In case of a vacancy in the office of attorney general the
governor a majority of the members of the state loan and
investment board shall appoint a qualified person to fill
the vacancy in accordance with the provisions of W.S.
28-12-101(b).

9-1-603. Duties generally; retention of qualified
practicing attorneys; matters in which county or state is
party or has interest; assistance to county and district
attorneys in felony trials; coordination of county and
school safety activities; bankruptcy proceedings.
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795

(b) With the approval of the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board the
attorney general may retain qualified practicing attorneys
to prosecute fee-generating suits for the state if
expertise in a particular field is desirable.

(c) Upon the failure or refusal of any district or
county attorney to act in any criminal or civil case or
matter in which the county, state or any agency thereof is
a party, or has an interest, the attorney general may, at
the request of the board of county commissioners of the
county involved or of the district judge of the judicial
district involved, act on behalf of the county, state or
any agency thereof, if after a thorough investigation the
action is deemed advisable by the attorney general. The
cost of investigation and the cost of any prosecution
arising therefrom shall be paid out of the general fund of
the county where the investigation and prosecution take
place. The attorney general shall also, upon direction of
the governor a majority of the members of the state loan
and investment board, investigate any matter in any county
of the state in which the county, state or any agency
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
thereof may be interested. After investigation, the
attorney general shall submit a report of the investigation
to the governor state loan and investment board and to the
district or county attorney of each county involved and may
take such other action as he the attorney general deems
appropriate.

9-1-605. Approval of public securities and official
bonds; water rights proceedings; investigation of
misconduct of county official; report to state loan and
investment board; commencement of action.

(b) Under the direction of the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board the
attorney general shall institute and pursue proceedings to
maintain the state's and its citizens' rights in the waters
of interstate streams.

(c) Upon representation to the governor state loan
and investment board of misconduct or malfeasance in office
or the commission of a crime by any county officer in the
state and if the governor believes a majority of the
members of the state loan and investment board believe the
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
ends of justice demand or the matter will not be properly
investigated and prosecuted by the sheriff and by the
district attorney of the county, the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board may
direct the attorney general to investigate the case.

(d) Upon completion of the investigation, the
attorney general shall report the results of the
investigation and his recommendations to the governor state
loan and investment board. If the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board and the
attorney general determine that the attorney general should
institute a criminal or civil action, the attorney general
shall commence the action. The attorney general shall have
the authority and duty vested in district attorneys in this
state.

9-1-608. Assistant attorneys general.

(a) With the approval of the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board, the
attorney general may appoint assistant attorneys general
necessary for the efficient operation of his office. Each
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
assistant attorney general shall be a member in good
standing of the Wyoming bar and shall serve at the pleasure
of the attorney general. The assistants shall act under the
direction of the attorney general and his deputies. The
attorney general, his deputies or his assistants may appear
in any courts of the state or the United States and
prosecute or defend on behalf of the state. An appearance
by the attorney general or his staff does not waive the
sovereign immunity of the state.

(b) With the approval of the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board the
attorney general may appoint special assistant attorneys
general for any purposes. A person shall not be employed as
an attorney or legal counsel by any department, board,
agency, commission or institution of the state, or
represent the state in that capacity, except by the written
appointment of the attorney general. Written appointment of
the attorney general shall not be required for the
employment of legal counsel by elected state officials.

9-1-611. Division of criminal investigation; created;
definitions; director; appointment; qualifications.
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795

(c) With the approval of the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board, the
attorney general shall appoint a director who is the chief
administrative officer and chief agent of the division.

9-1-618. Agents to be safeguarded as peace officers;
general assistance to state, county or local authorities;
investigative duties.

(b) The division shall investigate:

(i) Suspected criminal activity when directed by
the governor the attorney general to do so;

9-1-633. Wyoming law enforcement academy; director;
appointment; term; qualifications; employees; salaries;
curriculum and training programs; fees; disposition.

(a) A director of the Wyoming law enforcement academy
shall be appointed by the attorney general with the consent
of the governor a majority of the members of the state loan
and investment board. The director shall serve at the
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
pleasure of the attorney general. He The director shall
have administrative and operational experience in criminal
justice and such other qualifications as are satisfactory
to the attorney general.

(b) The director may employ assistants, instructors
and other personnel as approved by the attorney general
with the consent of the governor a majority of the members
of the state loan and investment board. The attorney
general may appoint the director as a peace officer, if
qualified pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707. The
director may appoint full-time staff instructors who
qualify pursuant to W.S. 9-1-701 through 9-1-707 to perform
as peace officers. Persons appointed as peace officers
pursuant to this subsection shall be considered peace
officers only:

9-1-636. Division of victim services; created;
appointment of director and deputy director; administrative
and clerical employees; definitions.

(b) With the approval of the governor, The attorney
general shall appoint a director who is the chief
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
administrative officer of the division. The director is
responsible to the attorney general for the operation of
the division and shall serve at the pleasure of the
attorney general.

(c) With the consent of the attorney general and the
governor, and subject to legislative appropriation, the
director may:

9-4-218. Federal natural resource policy account
created; purposes.

(a) There is created an account known as the "federal
natural resource policy account." Funds within the account
may be expended by the governor on behalf of the state of
Wyoming and its local governments, to take any of the
actions specified in this subsection related to federal
land, water, air, mineral and other natural resource
policies which may affect the tax base of the state,
wildlife management, state species, recreation, private
property rights, water rights or leasehold rights. Funds
also may be expended for preparing and participating in
environmental impact statements and environmental
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
assessments, including analysis of economic or social and
natural or physical environmental effects on the human
environment. Funds also may be expended for coordinating
and participating in rangeland health assessments pursuant
to W.S. 11-2-207. The governor may expend funds from the
federal natural resource policy account for:

(iii) Investigating, initiating, intervening or
otherwise participating in litigation, or taking any other
legal action by the state, a state agency or the counties
of the state individually or jointly, that furthers the
purposes of this subsection. In carrying out this
subsection, the attorney general with approval of a
majority of the members of the state loan and investment
board, or the counties, with approval of the governor, may
retain qualified practicing attorneys to act for the state
or the counties, including providing representation in
other forums with the federal government or other state or
county governments that may preclude or resolve any
outstanding issues or attempting to influence pertinent
federal legislation;

9-14-101. Second amendment defense.
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795

The attorney general may seek to intervene or file an
amicus curiae brief in any lawsuit filed in any state or
federal court in Wyoming, or filed against any Wyoming
citizen or firm in any other jurisdiction for damages for
injuries as a result of the use of fire arms firearms that
are not defective, if in his judgment, the action endangers
the constitutional right of citizens of Wyoming to keep and
bear arms. The attorney general is directed to advance
arguments that protect the constitutional right to bear
arms. Before intervening in any lawsuit pursuant to this
section, the attorney general shall obtain the approval of
the governor a majority of the members of the state loan
and investment board.

9-14-102. Unauthorized federal agency actions.

(c) The attorney general may seek to take action
before the federal environmental protection agency, the
federal occupational safety and health administration or
any other federal agency or in any state or federal court
to stop the enforcement, administration or implementation
of rulemaking or other actions taken by those agencies any
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
federal agency if, in his judgment, the rulemaking or other
action exceeds the authority granted by the United States
congress or otherwise rests on questionable authority.
Before intervening in or initiating any lawsuit pursuant to
this section, the attorney general shall obtain the
approval of the governor a majority of the members of the
state loan and investment board.

11-19-605. Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep relocation
and removal; legislative findings; reimbursement; attorney
general action.

(h) With the approval of the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board, the
attorney general shall seek to intervene in any lawsuit if
a federal action is contrary to the state's policy
regarding Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep set forth in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section or that is
inconsistent with the Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep plan.

(j) With the approval of the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board, the
attorney general shall file an action against any federal
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
agency to stop the enforcement, administration or
implementation of any federal agency rule, instructional
memo, handbook or other action taken by a federal agency if
the rule, instructional memo, handbook or other action is
contrary to the Wyoming bighorn/domestic sheep plan or is
otherwise contrary to law.

18-3-902. State loan and investment board to direct
district attorney or attorney general to commence action;
petition served with summons; pleading; trial; judgment;
change of judge.

(a) Whenever it appears to the governor a majority of
the members of the state loan and investment board on the
verified complaint of qualified electors or the board of
county commissioners of the county that any county officer
is guilty of misconduct or malfeasance in office, he a
majority of the members of the state loan and investment
board may direct the attorney general to commence and
prosecute an action in the district court of the county in
which the officer is an official asking for the removal of
the officer. The action shall be commenced by the filing of
a verified petition in the name of the state of Wyoming
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
signed by the attorney general setting forth the facts
constituting the misconduct or malfeasance in office.

28-12-101. Appointments by governor or state loan and
investment board; vacancies.

(a) The governor, or the state loan and investment
board in the case of the attorney general, shall submit to
the senate the name, address and occupation of each person
he proposes for appointment to public office and for which
senate advice and consent is required under either the
constitution or laws of this state. In addition and for
those appointments for which political party affiliation is
specified by law, the governor shall provide the senate
with documentation of compliance with W.S. 9-1-218(e). The
information required by this section shall be submitted to
the senate by:

(b) The governor, or the state loan and investment
board in the case of the attorney general, may fill any
vacancy occurring between sessions of the legislature by
temporary appointment to be effective until March 1 of the
ensuing calendar year.
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795

28-12-102. Senate consideration of appointments;
procedure; roll call vote required.

(b) After review of nominees in accordance with
subsection (a) of this section, the senate, within five (5)
legislative working days after submission by roll call
vote, shall confirm or reject each gubernatorial or state
loan and investment board nominee requiring the advice and
consent of the senate.

(c) If the senate does not consent to a nominee for a
given office, the governor, or state loan and investment
board in the case of the attorney general, shall submit the
name, address and biography of another person for senate
consideration if the legislature is still in session. If
the legislature has adjourned, the governor, or state loan
and investment board in the case of the attorney general,
may make a temporary appointment as provided in W.S.
28-12-101(b). No person rejected by the senate shall be
appointed to or serve in, either temporarily or otherwise,
the public office for which his nomination was rejected.

HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
35-7-1004. Personnel to administer provisions.

The attorney general by and with the consent of the
governor a majority of the members of the state loan and
investment board may employ such personnel as necessary to
administer this act. Such personnel shall serve at the
pleasure of the attorney general at such compensation as
may be approved by the Wyoming personnel division. Said
personnel shall be assigned such duties as may be necessary
to assist the commissioner in the performance of his
responsibilities under this act for the efficient operation
of the work of the office.

35-11-1507. Injunction proceedings; penalties.

(a) When, in the opinion of the governor a majority
of the members of the state loan and investment board, a
person is violating or is about to violate any provision of
this article, the governor a majority of the members of the
state loan and investment board shall direct the attorney
general to apply to the appropriate court for an order
enjoining the person from engaging or continuing to engage
in the activity. Upon a showing that the person has
HB0327

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0795
engaged, or is about to engage in the activity, the court
may grant a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining
order or other order.

Section 2. The state loan and investment board shall
appoint an attorney general not later than January 31, 2026
for confirmation consideration by the Wyoming Senate during
the 2026 Budget Session. The attorney general serving at
the time an attorney general is confirmed by the Senate
shall cease serving at the time of confirmation unless that
person is confirmed by the Senate as attorney general.

Section 3. The state loan and investment board shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4. This act is effective January 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0327